Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1700XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 355 Section 1. Section 70A.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Salaries specifically provided for in an 3 appropriation Act of the general assembly shall be in lieu of 4 existing statutory salaries, for the positions provided for in 5 the Act, and all salaries, including longevity where applicable 6 by express provision in the Code, shall be paid according to 7 the provisions of chapter 91A and shall be in full compensation 8 of all services, including any service on committees, boards, 9 commissions or similar duty for Iowa government, except for 10 members of the general assembly. A Except as provided in 11 paragraph âbâ , a state employee on an annual salary shall not 12 be paid for a pay period an amount which that exceeds the 13 employeeâs annual salary transposed into a rate applicable to 14 the pay period by dividing the annual salary by the number of 15 pay periods in the fiscal year. 16 b. A state employee whose annual salary is under one hundred 17 twenty-five thousand dollars and who is not covered by the 18 overtime payment provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards 19 Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§201 et seq., shall be eligible for overtime 20 payment at the rate of one and one-half times the regular rate 21 at which the employee is employed, as though such employee 22 were so covered. Salaries for state employees covered by the 23 overtime payment provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards 24 Act or this paragraph shall be established on an hourly basis. 25